Washington statutes.
RCW 3.34.060

District judges—Eligibility and qualifications.

To be eligible to file a declaration of candidacy for and to serve as a district court judge, a person must:

(1) Be a registered voter of the district court district and electoral district, if any; and

(2) Be either:

(a) A lawyer admitted to practice law in the state of Washington; or

(b) In those districts having a population of less than five thousand persons, a person who has taken and passed by January 1, 2003, the qualifying examination for a lay candidate for judicial officer as provided by rule of the supreme court.

[ 2002 c 136 s 1; 1991 c 361 s 1; 1989 c 227 s 4; 1984 c 258 s 12; 1961 c 299 s 15.]

NOTES:

Intent—1989 c 227: See note following RCW 3.38.070.

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.